Nebraska, session 109, LB1239.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1239 LB1239
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 71-2451.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
71-2451.01 Unless otherwise allowed by state or federal law or
regulation, the management of a long-term care facility at which an
automated medication system is located shall not require a resident of
the facility to obtain medication through the automated medication system
and shall not restrict or impair the ability of a resident of the
facility to obtain a medication medications from the pharmacy of the
resident's choice.
Sec. 2. Original section 71-2451.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-